Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1145.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) Counties must collect and retain records of any public works activity that it undertakes.(b) At a minimum, the records of public works activity must include:(i) If more than a de minimis amount of soil, trees, shrubs, gravel, or other natural or organic material that was present prior to the public works activity was removed during the activity, the amount of such material that was removed;(ii) Where the removed materials were taken and how they were disposed of;(iii) Whether any of the removed materials were reused for other projects; and(iv) Whether the materials were tested for contaminants and the results of any such tests.(2) For the purposes of this section:(a) "De minimis amount" means an amount of natural or organic material removed that would be too small to be reasonably noticed by the naked eye without a detailed examination of the area.(b) "Public works activity" means any maintenance or construction activity that is undertaken by the county on a county road as defined in chapter 46.04 RCW that is on or adjacent to property owned by another.--- END ---